Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5500.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 5-37.3 of the General Laws entitled "Confidentiality of Health Care
Communications and Information Act" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
5-37.3-4.1. Additional limitations on and permitted disclosures.
(a) The purpose of this section is to establish a pilot program authorizing certain additional
permitted disclosures to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities, and
hospitals (“BHDDH”).
(b) For the period commencing July 1, 2025, and ending on December 31, 2026, the
following provisions shall be in effect:
(1) No consent for release or transfer of confidential healthcare information shall be
required to report allegations of abuse, neglect, mistreatment, exploitation, death or violation of
rights to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, or to
produce records to BHDDH, when BHDDH makes a written demand for records to a BHDDH-
licensed organization, and/or to a facility or program subject to chapter 5 of title 40.1 ("mental
health law"), pursuant to either chapter 5, 24, 24.5, 26, or 27 of title 40.1, for any of the
organization's or client's or patient's records.
(2) If any staff member of the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental
disabilities and hospitals who is authorized by its director makes a written demand for records
pursuant to either chapter 5, 24, 24.5, 26, or 27 of title 40.1 for any of the organization's or client's

or patient's records while BHDDH is investigating an alleged incident of abuse, neglect,
mistreatment, exploitation, death, or other violation of rights of an individual who has received or
is receiving services from either a facility or program subject to chapter 5 of title 40.1 ("mental
health law") or an organization licensed by BHDDH, the records identified in such written demand
for records shall be immediately produced to BHDDH; provided, however, that:
(i) The BHDDH written demand for records shall include notice that BHDDH has opened
an investigation with regard to abuse, neglect, mistreatment, exploitation, death, or violation of
rights of a patient or client of the facility, program or organization, and the notice shall include the
patient's or client's name if BHDDH is aware of the name;
(ii) If the recipient of the written demand for records fails to comply, BHDDH may file in
the superior court a petition for writ of mandamus or similar petition for the records requested in
the written demand for records; and
(iii) For purposes of this section, BHDDH is designated as a health oversight agency as the
term is used in 42 CFR § 164.512, and is designated as both a social-service agency and protective
services agency as those terms are used in §5-37.3-4.
(c) On or before March 31, 2027, the director of BHDDH shall submit to the governor, the
speaker of the house, and the president of the senate, a report which shall include, at a minimum,
the number of written demands for records made by BHDDH under this section, the number of
petitions filed by BHDDH under this section and the results or decision of such petitions, and any
recommendations as to the continuation of or amendments to the provisions of this section.
(d) Unless extended by the general assembly, the provisions of this section shall sunset and
expire on March 31, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall sunset and expire on March
31, 2027.
========
LC001337/SUB A
========
LC001337/SUB A - Page 2 of 3